Arkansas, session 2025, HB1085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-84-102 is amended to read as follows:
6-84-102. Purpose.
It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to create and establish
the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in
*JLL079*
01-29-2025 08:59:59 JLL079

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1085
effect on January 1, 2020 2024, to be administered by the Section 529 Plan
Review Committee through the adoption of rules for the administration of the
plan.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-84-103(5) and (6), concerning the
definitions used under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, are
amended to read as follows:
(5) “Committee” means the Section 529 Plan Review Committee,
provided for in § 6-84-105, which shall oversee the administration of the
Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan and ensure that the plan complies with the
provisions of this chapter and acts in accordance with 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in
effect on January 1, 2020 2024;
(6) “Contribution” means:
(A) Any payment directly allocated to an account for the
benefit of a designated beneficiary or used to pay administrative fees
associated with an account; and
(B) That portion of any rollover amount treated as a
contribution under 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-84-103(10), concerning the definitions
used under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(10) “Member of the family” shall have the same meaning as is
contained in 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-84-103(12), concerning the definitions
used under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(12) “Person” means a person as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 529, as
in effect on January 1, 2020 2024;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-84-103(14) and (15), concerning the
definitions used under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, are
amended to read as follows:
(14) “Qualified higher education expenses” means tuition and
other permitted expenses as set forth in 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on
01-29-2025 08:59:59 JLL079

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1085
January 1, 2020 2024, for the enrollment or attendance of a designated
beneficiary;
(15) “Qualified tuition program” means a qualified tuition
program as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024;

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-84-103(17), concerning the definitions
used under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(17) “Rollover” means a disbursement or transfer from an account
that is transferred to or deposited within sixty (60) calendar days of the
transfer:
(A) Into an account of the same person for the benefit of
the same designated beneficiary;
(B) To the credit of another person as a designated
beneficiary if the transferee account was created under this chapter or under
another qualified tuition program maintained in accordance with 26 U.S.C. §
529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024; or
(C)(i) Before January 1, 2026, into an ABLE account under
26 U.S.C. § 529A(e)(6), as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024, of the
designated beneficiary or a member of the family of the designated
beneficiary.
(ii) Subdivision (17)(C)(i) of this section does not
apply to so much of a distribution which, when added to all other
contributions made to the ABLE account for the taxable year, exceeds the
limitation under 26 U.S.C. § 529A(b)(2)(B)(i), as in effect on January 1,
2020 2024.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-84-103, concerning the definitions used
under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(18) "Rollover to Roth individual retirement account" means a
direct trustee-to-trustee transfer from an account on or after January 1,
2024, to a Roth individual retirement account for the benefit of the
designated beneficiary that qualifies as a tax-free distribution under 26
U.S.C. § 529(c)(3)(E), as in effect on January 1, 2024.

01-29-2025 08:59:59 JLL079

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1085
SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-84-105(b), concerning the administration
of the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act and the powers and duties of
the Section 529 Plan Review Committee, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The committee shall adopt such rules as it deems necessary and
proper to administer this chapter and to ensure the compliance of the
Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan with 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on
January 1, 2020 2024.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-84-105(c)(1), concerning the powers and
duties of the Section 529 Plan Review Committee under the Arkansas Brighter
Future Fund Plan Act, is amended to read as follows:
(1) To establish, develop, implement, and maintain the plan in a
manner consistent with the provisions of this chapter and 26 U.S.C. § 529, as
in effect on January 1, 2020 2024, and to obtain the benefits provided by 26
U.S.C. § 529 for the plan, account owners, and designated beneficiaries;

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-84-106 is amended to read as follows:
6-84-106. Investment direction.
Except as permitted in 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2020
2024, no person shall have the right to direct the investment of any
contributions to or earnings from the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 6-84-108(b), concerning the naming of a
designated beneficiary and transfers of accounts under the Arkansas Brighter
Future Fund Plan Act, is amended to read as follows:
(b) At the direction of an account owner, all or a portion of an
account may be transferred to another account of which the designated
beneficiary is a member of the family of the designated beneficiary of the
transferee account if the transferee account was created by this chapter or
under another qualified tuition program maintained in accordance with 26
U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 6-84-109(b)(2), concerning account
withdrawals under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(2) The report shall be made at the time required by the rules
01-29-2025 08:59:59 JLL079

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1085
of the Internal Revenue Service as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024 and
contain such information as is required by law.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 6-84-111(a)(1), concerning funds exempt
from tax under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(a)(1) Except as otherwise indicated in this chapter, interest,
dividends, and capital gains from funds invested in the Arkansas Brighter
Future Fund Plan or a tax-deferred tuition savings program established by
another state under 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024,
shall be exempt from Arkansas income taxes.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 6-84-111(b)(3), concerning funds exempt
from tax under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(3) Contributions to this plan that have been deducted from the
taxpayer employee's adjusted gross income for prior tax years shall be
subject to recapture from the taxpayer employee if the taxpayer employee:
(A) Makes a subsequent nonqualified withdrawal from the
account; or
(B) Rolls the account over to a tax-deferred tuition
savings program established by another state or institution under 26 U.S.C. §
529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 6-84-111(c)-(g), concerning funds exempt
from tax under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, are amended to
read as follows:
(c)(1)(A) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017,
contributions to a tuition savings account established under this plan or a
tax-deferred tuition savings program established by another state under 26
U.S.C. § 529, as it existed on January 1, 2017 2024, may be deducted from the
taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the purpose of calculating Arkansas
income tax under § 26-51-403(b).
(B) A taxpayer may not deduct from the taxpayer's adjusted
gross income a contribution to a tax-deferred tuition savings program
established by another state if the taxpayer deducted the contribution in
01-29-2025 08:59:59 JLL079

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1085
another state or on another state's income taxes.
(2)(A) The deductible contributions for a tuition savings
account established under this chapter shall not exceed five thousand dollars
($5,000) per taxpayer in any tax year.
(B) If the aggregate amount of contributions by a taxpayer
during a tax year exceeds the limitation under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this
section, the unused aggregate amount may be carried forward to the next
succeeding four (4) tax years.
(C) The deductible contributions for a tax-deferred
tuition savings program established by another state under 26 U.S.C. § 529,
as it existed on January 1, 2017 2024, shall not exceed three thousand
dollars ($3,000) per taxpayer in any tax year.
(D) The deductible contributions for a tax-deferred
tuition savings program established by another state under 26 U.S.C. § 529,
as it existed on January 1, 2017 2024, that are rolled over into a tuition
savings account established under this chapter shall not exceed seven
thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per taxpayer in the tax year in which
they were rolled over.
(d)(1)(A) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2018,
contributions to a tuition savings account established under the plan or a
tax-deferred tuition savings program established by another state under 26
U.S.C. § 529, as it existed on January 1, 2018 2024, may be deducted from
the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the purpose of calculating Arkansas
income tax under § 26-51-403(b).
(B) A taxpayer may not deduct from the taxpayer's adjusted
gross income a contribution to a tax-deferred tuition savings program
established by another state if the taxpayer deducted the contribution in
another state or on another state's income taxes.
(2)(A) The deductible contributions for a tuition savings
account established under this chapter shall not exceed five thousand dollars
($5,000) per taxpayer in any tax year.
(B) If the aggregate amount of contributions by a taxpayer
during a tax year exceeds the limitation under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this
section, the unused aggregate amount may be carried forward to the next
succeeding four (4) tax years.
(C) The deductible contributions for a tax-deferred
01-29-2025 08:59:59 JLL079

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1085
tuition savings program established by another state under 26 U.S.C. § 529,
as it existed on January 1, 2018 2024, shall not exceed three thousand
dollars ($3,000) per taxpayer in any tax year.
(D) The deductible contributions for a tax-deferred
tuition savings program established by another state under 26 U.S.C. § 529,
as it existed on January 1, 2018 2024, that are rolled over into a tuition
savings account established under this chapter shall not exceed seven
thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per taxpayer in the tax year in which
they were rolled.
(e)(1)(A) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2021,
contributions to a tuition savings account established under the plan or a
tax-deferred tuition savings program established by another state under 26
U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024, may be deducted from the
taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the purpose of calculating Arkansas
income tax under § 26-51-403(b).
(B) A taxpayer may not deduct from the taxpayer's adjusted
gross income a contribution to a tax-deferred tuition savings program
established by another state if the taxpayer deducted the contribution in
another state or on another state's income taxes.
(2)(A) The deductible contributions for a tuition savings
account established under this chapter shall not exceed five thousand dollars
($5,000) per taxpayer in any tax year.
(B) If the aggregate amount of contributions by a taxpayer
during a tax year exceeds the limitation under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this
section, the unused aggregate amount may be carried forward to the next
succeeding four (4) tax years.
(C) The deductible contributions for a tax-deferred
tuition savings program established by another state under 26 U.S.C. § 529,
as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024, shall not exceed three thousand dollars
($3,000) per taxpayer in any tax year.
(D) The deductible contributions for a tax-deferred
tuition savings program established by another state under 26 U.S.C. § 529,
as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024, that are rolled over into a tuition
savings account established under this chapter shall not exceed seven
thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per taxpayer in the tax year in which
they were rolled over.
01-29-2025 08:59:59 JLL079

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1085
(f)(1) Qualified withdrawals, rollovers, and rollovers to a Roth
individual retirement account from a tuition savings account established
under this plan or a tax-deferred tuition savings program established by
another state under 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024,
will be exempt from Arkansas income tax with respect to the designated
beneficiary's income.
(2)(A) Nonqualified withdrawals from a tuition savings account
established under this plan or a tax-deferred tuition savings program
established by another state under 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January
1, 2020 2024, will be subject to Arkansas income tax.
(B) The nonqualified withdrawal will be taxable to the
party, account owner, or designated beneficiary who actually makes the
withdrawal.
(g) Any earnings on the contribution that are included in the refund
will be subject to Arkansas income tax if an account owner receives a refund
of contributions to a tuition savings account established under this plan or
a tax-deferred tuition savings program established by another state under 26
U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024, because of either:
(1) The death or disability of the designated beneficiary; or
(2) A scholarship, allowance, or payment described in 26 U.S.C.
§ 135(d)(1)(B) or (d)(1)(C), as in effect on January 1, 2018, received by the
designated beneficiary.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 6-84-113 is amended to read as follows:
6-84-113. Liberal construction.
This chapter shall be liberally construed to comply with the
requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2020 2024.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 26-51-414(b), concerning the tax treatment
of deferred compensation plans, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Title 26 U.S.C. § 408A as in effect on January 1, 2010, relating
to Roth individual retirement accounts, is adopted for the purpose of
computing Arkansas income tax liability, except with regard to: adjusted
(1) Adjusted gross income under 26 U.S.C. § 408A(c)(3), which
shall be determined in the same manner as under § 26-51-403(b); and
(2) Rollover contributions from a tuition savings account
01-29-2025 08:59:59 JLL079

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1085
established under the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, § 6-84-101 et
seq., or a tax-deferred tuition savings program established by another state
under 26 U.S.C. § 529, as in effect on January 1, 2024, which shall be
treated as provided in 26 U.S.C. § 408A(c)(3)(E), § 408A(c)(5), and §
408A(e)(1), as they existed on December 29, 2022.

SECTION 18. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-17 of this act are effective
for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024.

/s/K. Brown


























01-29-2025 08:59:59 JLL079